Idaho statutes. Title 7 SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 2
WRITS OF REVIEW

Sec.

§ 7-201. Designation.

The writ of certiorari may be denominated the writ of review and shall be processed in the manner provided by rule of the supreme court.

§ 7-202. When granted.

A writ of review may be granted by any court except the magistrates division of the district court, when an inferior tribunal, board or officer exercising judicial functions, has exceeded the jurisdiction of such tribunal, board or officer, and there is no appeal, nor, in the judgment of the court, any plain, speedy and adequate remedy.

§ 7-202. When granted.

A writ of review may be granted by any court except the magistrates division of the district court, when an inferior tribunal, board or officer exercising judicial functions, has exceeded the jurisdiction of such tribunal, board or officer, and there is no appeal, nor, in the judgment of the court, any plain, speedy and adequate remedy.

§ 7-203 — 7-207. Application and order to show cause — Writ — Contents, service and how directed — Stay of proceedings. [Repealed.]

§ 7-208. Extent of review.

The review upon this writ cannot be extended further than to determine whether the inferior tribunal, board or officer has regularly pursued the authority of such tribunal, board or officer.

§ 7-208. Extent of review.

The review upon this writ cannot be extended further than to determine whether the inferior tribunal, board or officer has regularly pursued the authority of such tribunal, board or officer.

§ 7-209 — 7-211. Defective return — Full return — Hearing and judgment — Transmittal of judgment. [Repealed.]